Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 alawi .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 alayer .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 alborg .

SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 aldives .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 aldonado .

SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 ale .

SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 alé .

SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 alegaon .

SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 alegre .

SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 aler .

SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 alew .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 aleza .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 alfeld .

SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 algonda .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 alheur .

SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 ali .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 alina .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 aling .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 aliya .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 alkajgiri .

SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 alkot .

SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 allawi .

SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 almö .

SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 aloa .

SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 aloelap .

SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 alogne .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 alolos .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 alona .

SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 alouines .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 alout .

SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 ālpils .

SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 alpur .

SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 altchik .

SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 alte .

SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 am .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 amacca .

SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 amaka .

SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 amance .

SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 amangan .

SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 amarca .

SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 amatsu .

SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 ambéré .

SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 amdrik .

SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 ame .

SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 ameda .

SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0 amelles .

SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 amen .

SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 amentenga .

SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 amford .

SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 amgarh .

SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 ami .

SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 amibe .

SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 amibie .

SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 amo .

SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 amón .

SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 amos .

SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 amosa .

SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 amou .

SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 amoudzou .

SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 ampo .

SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 ampton .

SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 ampula .

SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 amtha .

SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 amu .

SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 amur .

SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 amusi .

SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 an .

SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 ana .

SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 anabí .

SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 anado .

SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 anagua .

SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 anama .

SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 anassas .

SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 anatee .

SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 anatí .

SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 anatuto .

SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 anaus .

SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 anawatu .

SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 anca .

SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 ance .

SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 ancha .

SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 anchang .

SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 anche .

SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 ancheng .

SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 anchester .

SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 anchong .

SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 anchuan .

SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 ancy .

SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 and .

SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 anda .

SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 andaj .

SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 andalay .

SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 andaluyong .

SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 andaue .

SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 ande .

SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 anded .

SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 andega .

SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 ander .

SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 andhe .

SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 andi .

SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 andoul .

SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 andovo .

SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 andsaur .

SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 andú .

SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 andurbar .

SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 anduva .

SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 andya .

SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 andyal .

SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 ane .

SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 ang .

SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 angaia .

SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 angalore .

SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 angarhâr .

SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 angas .

SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 angcheng .

SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 angdong .

SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 angdu .

SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 angel .

SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 angfan .

SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 angilao .

SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 angjin .

SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 angloi .

SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 angmen .

SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 ango .

SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 angochi .

SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 angong .

SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 angrove .

SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 angshan .

SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 angsu .

SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 angtan .

SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 anguistaou .

SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 angxi .

SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 angxiang .

SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 angyan .

SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 angyin .

SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 angyou .

SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 anhattan .

SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 anhongor .

SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 ani .

SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 anica .

SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 anicaland .

SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 anie .

SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 aniema .

SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 anihiki .

SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 anille .

SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0 anipur .

SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 anisa .

SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 anislaus .

SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 anistee .

SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 anitoba .

SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 anitowoc .

SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 anizales .

SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 ankang .

SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 ankin .

SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 0 anley .

SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 0 anly .

SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 0 ann .

SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 annheim .

SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 0 anning .

SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 0 año .

SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 0 anor .

SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 0 anouba .

SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 0 anping .

SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 anque .

SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 ans .

SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 ansa .

SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 ansfeld .

SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 0 anshya .

SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 0 ansis .

SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 ansk .

SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 0 ansourah .

SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 0 anta .

SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 antao .

SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 0 antep .

SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 antes .

SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 0 anti .

SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0 anton .

SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 0 antong .

SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 0 antou .

SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0 antucket .

SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 0 anu .

SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 0 anufahi .

SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 0 anumaga .

SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 anumea .

SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 anus .

SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 anxi .

SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 anxiong .

SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 0 any .

SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 anyang .

SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 0 anyara .

SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 anza .

SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 0 anzanillo .

SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 anzhouli .

SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 0 anzini .

SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0 ão .

SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 aogan .

SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 aohe .

SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 aojiang .

SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 0 aoka .

SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0 aoming .

SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 0 aonan .

SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 0 aozhou .

SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 0 aozuo .

SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 apa .

SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 apas .

SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 0 aperville .

SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 aples .

SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 0 aplouse .

SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 apo .

SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 0 apoca .

SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 apolis .

SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 apoosa .

SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 0 apula .

SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 0 apur .

SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 apura .

SFX 439 N 1
SFX 439 0 aputo .

SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 aquin .

SFX 441 N 1
SFX 441 0 ar .

SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 ara .

SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 arabá .

SFX 444 N 1
SFX 444 0 arabeasca .

SFX 445 N 1
SFX 445 0 aracaibo .

SFX 446 N 1
SFX 446 0 aracanaú .

SFX 447 N 1
SFX 447 0 aracay .

SFX 448 N 1
SFX 448 0 aradi .

SFX 449 N 1
SFX 449 0 aragha .

SFX 450 N 1
SFX 450 0 aragibe .

SFX 451 N 1
SFX 451 0 arahoué .

SFX 452 N 1
SFX 452 0 arakei .

SFX 453 N 1
SFX 453 0 aramureș .

SFX 454 N 1
SFX 454 0 arand .

SFX 455 N 1
SFX 455 0 aranhão .

SFX 456 N 1
SFX 456 0 aranjito .

SFX 457 N 1
SFX 457 0 arashino .

SFX 458 N 1
SFX 458 0 arathiwat .

SFX 459 N 1
SFX 459 0 arathon .

SFX 460 N 1
SFX 460 0 arawi .

SFX 461 N 1
SFX 461 0 arayanganj .

SFX 462 N 1
SFX 462 0 arazuka .

SFX 463 N 1
SFX 463 0 arbella .

SFX 464 N 1
SFX 464 0 arborn .

SFX 465 N 1
SFX 465 0 arbourg .

SFX 466 N 1
SFX 466 0 arches .

SFX 467 N 1
SFX 467 0 arcos .

SFX 468 N 1
SFX 468 0 ardan .

SFX 469 N 1
SFX 469 0 ardin .

SFX 470 N 1
SFX 470 0 ardjik .

SFX 471 N 1
SFX 471 0 ards .

SFX 472 N 1
SFX 472 0 ardson .

SFX 473 N 1
SFX 473 0 are .

SFX 474 N 1
SFX 474 0 aré .

SFX 475 N 1
SFX 475 0 arém .
