Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
A/226,479,566,567,568,569,572,573,574,590
Ach/255,507,815,889
Arak/290
Bas/444,1047,1049,1054,1084
Berg/267,805,1090,1673
Cham/242,603,1490,1491,1498,1501
Chi/333,428,561,566,607,648,700,705,713,716,852,873,910,1012,1058,1163,1182,1203,1215
Chin/320,670,688,698,775,950,1074
Dali/290
Durg/437
Fort/235,1054
Gazi/397,1523
Hall/312,775
Hot/290
Jo/418,440,743
Lamb/474,559
Lib/290,831,835,846,847,849,1547,1558,1807
Lu/307,313,333,391,436,579,580
Mong/441,1298
Nil/322,1461
North/284,788,1192,1740,1785
Pays/327
Paz/470
Pearl/312
Rich/471,472,1192,1297
Rush/290,805
Salam/302,387,527
Sha/409,592,644,701,896,975,988,996,999,1002,1004,1005,1007,1008,1156,1158,1252,1258,1313,1343,1359,1365,1370,1372,1378,1379,1403,1420,1423,1424,1441,1471,1483,1484,1485,1568,1572,1586,1588,1597,1632,1664,1770,1778,1789
Si/244
South/284,778,810,839,1192
Tak/260,264,422,462,517,539,821,981,1757
Tanger/333
Xi/270,290,338,339,342,353,356,382,396,412,419,675,706,815,913,1221,1354,1362,1367,1369,1373,1376,1377,1391,1394,1395,1399,1400,1401,1414,1425,1426,1428,1429,1430,1432,1823
Zou/442,684,887,1040,1346
